Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-208
Conveyances; execution.

All conveyance of or other instruments affecting real estate owned or held in trust by a trust company shall be authorized, prior to or within ninety days after the conveyance or execution of an instrument affecting real estate owned or held in trust, by a resolution of the board of directors or a committee appointed by the board of directors and signed in the name of the trust company by its president or vice president.

Laws 1911, c. 31, § 8, p. 192;

R.S.1913, § 745;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVIII, § 8, p. 721;

C.S.1922, § 8070;

C.S.1929, § 8-208;

R.S.1943, § 8-208;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 22;

Laws 2001, LB 53, § 3.